Georgia, session 2025_26, HB824.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
(a) On and after January 1, 2026, Dawson County shall no longer accept applications from
senior citizens for new senior homestead exemptions pursuant to the following Acts:
(1) An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Dawson County ad valorem taxes for
county purposes and Dawson County School District ad valorem taxes for educational
purposes in the amount of $10,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for certain
residents of that school district who are 62 to 74 years of age and who have household
incomes not exceeding $25,000.00; to provide a homestead exemption from such taxes for
the full value of such homestead for certain residents of that school district who are 75
years of age or older and who have household incomes not exceeding $25,000.00,
approved June 3, 2003 (Ga. L. 2003, p. 4431);
(2) An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Dawson County ad valorem taxes for
county purposes in the amount of $60,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for
H. B. 824
- 2 -

LC 61 0219/AP
residents of that county who are disabled or who are 65 years of age or older and whose
income does not exceed $50,000.00, approved May 13, 2008 (Ga. L. 2008, p. 3871), as
amended, particularly by an Act approved May 28, 2010 (Ga. L. 2010, p. 3695);
(3) An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Dawson County school district ad
valorem taxes for educational purposes in the amount of $60,000.00 of the assessed value
of the homestead for residents of that school district who are disabled or who are 65 years
of age or older and whose income does not exceed $50,000.00, approved May 13, 2008
(Ga. L. 2008, p. 3850), as amended, particularly by an Act approved May 28, 2010 (Ga.
L. 2010, p. 3611); and
(4) An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Dawson County school district ad
valorem taxes for educational purposes in the amount of $120,000.00 of the assessed value
of the homestead for residents of that school district who are 70 years of age or older,
approved May 28, 2010 (Ga. L. 2010, p. 3608).
(b) Senior citizens to whom a homestead exemption was granted prior to January 1, 2026,
pursuant to any Act included in subsection (a) of this section may continue to receive such
exemption or apply for another available homestead exemption, including those available
pursuant to the following Acts:
(1) An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Dawson County ad valorem taxes for
county purposes for certain senior citizens, approved April 22, 2024 (Ga. L. 2024, p. 3588);
and
(2) An Act to provide homestead exemptions from Dawson County school district ad
valorem taxes for educational purposes for certain senior citizens, approved April 22, 2024
(Ga. L. 2024, p. 3592).
H. B. 824
- 3 -

LC 61 0219/AP
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The election superintendent of Dawson County shall call and conduct an election as provided
in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of Dawson County for
approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall conduct that election no later than
the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November, 2025, and shall issue the call and
conduct that election as provided by general law. The election superintendent shall cause the
date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for two weeks immediately
preceding the date thereof in the official organ of Dawson County. The ballot shall have
written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides that, beginning January 1, 2026,
Dawson County will no longer accept applications for new senior
( ) NO homestead exemptions pursuant to the Acts listed below; provided,
however, that senior citizens who have already been approved for any of
these homestead exemptions may choose to continue to receive that
homestead exemption or apply for another available senior homestead
exemption?
(1) An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Dawson County ad
valorem taxes for county purposes and Dawson County School District
ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the amount of $10,000.00
of the assessed value of the homestead for certain residents of that school
district who are 62 to 74 years of age and who have household incomes
not exceeding $25,000.00; to provide a homestead exemption from such
H. B. 824
- 4 -

LC 61 0219/AP
taxes for the full value of such homestead for certain residents of that
school district who are 75 years of age or older and who have household
incomes not exceeding $25,000.00, approved June 3, 2003 (Ga. L. 2003,
p. 4431);
(2) An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Dawson County ad
valorem taxes for county purposes in the amount of $60,000.00 of the
assessed value of the homestead for residents of that county who are
100 disabled or who are 65 years of age or older and whose income does not
101 exceed $50,000.00, approved May 13, 2008 (Ga. L. 2008, p. 3871), as
102 amended, particularly by an Act approved May 28, 2010 (Ga.
103 L. 2010, p. 3695);
104 (3) An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Dawson County
105 school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the amount
106 of $60,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for residents of that
107 school district who are disabled or who are 65 years of age or older and
108 whose income does not exceed $50,000.00, approved May 13, 2008 (Ga.
109 L. 2008, p. 3850), as amended, particularly by an Act approved
110 May 28, 2010 (Ga. L. 2010, p. 3611); and
111 (4) An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Dawson County
112 school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes in the amount
113 of $120,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for residents of
114 that school district who are 70 years of age or older, approved May 28,
115 2010 (Ga. L. 2010, p. 3608).
116 This Act does not affect the availability of senior homestead exemptions
117 pursuant to the following Acts:
118 (1) An Act to provide a homestead exemption from Dawson County ad
119 valorem taxes for county purposes for certain senior citizens, approved
H. B. 824
- 5 -

LC 61 0219/AP
120 April 22, 2024, (Ga. L. 2024, p. 3588); or
121 (2) An Act to provide homestead exemptions from Dawson County
122 school district ad valorem taxes for educational purposes for certain
123 senior citizens, approved April 22, 2024, (Ga. L. 2024, p. 3592)."
124 All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
125 to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
126 such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
127 effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
128 as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
129 be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
130 in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by Dawson County. It shall be
131 the election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. The
132 provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the election superintendent and are not
133 intended as directory. If the election superintendent fails or refuses to comply with this
134 section, any elector of the Dawson County may apply for a writ of mandamus to compel the
135 election superintendent to perform his or her duties under this section. If the court finds that
136 the election superintendent has not complied with this section, the court shall fashion
137 appropriate relief requiring the election superintendent to call and conduct such election on
138 the date required by this section or on the next date authorized for special elections provided
139 for in Code Section 21-2-540 of the O.C.G.A.
140 SECTION 4.
141 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 824
- 6 -